Tennessee, session 114, HB1414.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Chapter 176 of the Private Acts of 1953, as amended by Chapter 524 of
the Private Acts of 1953, Chapter 95 of the Private Acts of 1985, Chapter 56 of the Private Acts
of 1991, Chapter 7 of the Private Acts of 2015, and Chapter 42 of the Private Acts of 2024, and
any other acts amendatory thereto, is amended by deleting Section 3 and substituting instead:
SECTION 3. The Hospital District shall be operated and controlled by a board of
trustees consisting of no less than three (3) and no more than seven (7) persons
appointed by the Henry County Commission. Two (2) of the trustees shall be members
of the Henry County Commission, and the remainder shall be citizens of Henry County
at large. Trustees shall serve for terms of four (4) years, staggered such that no more
than two (2) terms expire in any single year.
All trustees holding office on the effective date of this Act shall continue to serve
until their office becomes vacant (due to term expiration or otherwise). The Henry
County Commission may recall any trustee with or without cause. When a trustee's term
expires or an office becomes vacant, if it is necessary to maintain the minimum required
number of trustees, the Henry County Commission shall appoint a successor trustee
within ninety (90) days of the vacancy. If the expiration of a term or vacancy does not
result in fewer than the minimum number of required trustees, the Henry County
Commission may, in its discretion, appoint a successor trustee.
HB1414
001458
- 1 -

The Henry County Commission may appoint trustees from time to time in its
discretion up to the maximum number authorized above; provided, that the timing of the
appointments is such that terms are staggered as required above.
SECTION 2. Chapter 176 of the Private Acts of 1953, as amended by Chapter 314 of
the Private Acts of 1980, and any other acts amendatory thereto, is amended by deleting
Section 4 and substituting instead:
[Repealed by amendment in 2025.]
SECTION 3. Chapter 176 of the Private Acts of 1953, as amended by Chapter 524 of
the Private Acts of 1953, and Chapter 42 of the Private Acts of 2024, and any other acts
amendatory thereto, is amended by deleting the following language in Section 5:
That said Board shall hold regular meetings monthly on a date which it shall
establish.
and substituting instead:
The board of trustees shall hold regular meetings at least quarterly on dates
which it shall establish.
SECTION 4. If any provision of this act or the application thereof to any person or
circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of
this act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to that end the
provisions of this act are declared to be severable.
SECTION 5. Nothing in this act shall be construed as having the effect of removing any
incumbent from office or abridging the term of any official prior to the end of the term for which
such official was elected.
SECTION 6. This act shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote
of the legislative body of Henry County. Its approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by the
presiding officer of the legislative body and certified to the secretary of state.
- 2 - 001458

SECTION 7. For the purpose of approving or rejecting the provisions of this act, it shall
be effective upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, it shall
become effective as provided in Section 6.
- 3 - 001458